Maryland, session 2026, HB1373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) The State Department of Education shall study and make
recommendations on a framework for the regulation of child care programs for children
who are at least 5 years old that is distinct from the regulation of child care programs for
children who are under the age of 5 years.
(2) The framework established by the Department will focus on the unique
child care needs of after school and out of school time child care.
(b) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Department shall:
(1) investigate the regulatory barriers providers of after school and out of
school time child care programs face by having to adhere to the same regulatory and
licensing requirements adopted for full–day, early childhood child care centers;
(2) evaluate the unique needs of after school and out of school time child
care programs and how they differ from those of traditional, early childhood child care
centers, including:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1373*

HOUSE BILL 1373
(i) the ability to use spaces for limited hours that are normally
dedicated to other purposes, including schools, recreation centers, and churches;
(ii) the needs of the children served, including needs for physical
activity, time to do homework, distinct social and emotional development, and
transportation to novel locations;
(iii) the obligations of staff dedicated to overseeing programs for older
children, including the type of experiential and educational experience required;
(iv) the different needs of parents of children who are at least 5 years
old and how programs can best meet them; and
(v) the locations and populations of children who are eligible for
after school or out of school time child care programs and are underserved by the current
regulatory and licensing framework;
(3) identify and analyze regulations and licensing requirements in other
states that are distinctly designed for after school and out of school time child care
programs; and
(4) evaluate the administrative approach necessary to oversee the
particular needs of after school and out of school time child care programs, including:
(i) whether programs should be licensed by or registered with the
Department;
(ii) whether any adjustments need to be made to the approval,
prohibited behavior, and appeals processes for child care providers to better suit these
programs;
(iii) the feasibility of providing different licenses or differing sets of
rules and regulations for different tiers of programs depending on the types of services
provided;
(iv) changes needed within the Department to best structure the
oversight of these programs, including the need to potentially hire new staff and alter the
organization of the Department; and
(v) the time it would take to transition into a new administrative
approach and the regulatory framework that should govern these programs during that
interim.
(c) The recommendations required under subsection (a) of this section shall
include specific recommendations on the following:
(1) staffing requirements;

HOUSE BILL 1373 3
(2) facility requirements;
(3) staff to child ratio requirements;
(4) background check requirements;
(5) training requirements;
(6) emergency planning requirements;
(7) facility and spacing requirements;
(8) inspection requirements;
(9) parental notice and approval requirements; and
(10) health and safety requirements.
(d) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section the
Department shall consult with stakeholders.
(e) On or before December 1, 2026, the Department shall submit, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, a report of its findings and
recommendations to the Senate Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee and
the House Ways and Means Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.